Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 15. Games of Chance and Contests of Skill.

Cross references. —

For gambling offenses, see AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.280

; for exception to this chapter relating to raffles and auctions of certain permits to take big game, see AS

16.05.343

.

For a temporary provision relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, which provides an extension of
certain deadlines under this chapter until July 15, 2020, see § 11, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision allowing certain online charitable gaming ticket sales, see sec. 9, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For authorized games of chance and skill, see 15 AAC 160.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Virtually all of the documents and information submitted to the charitable gaming commission of the Department of Revenue are open to the public. If social security numbers are voluntarily provided by persons completing reports to the division, disclosure of those documents is not prohibited so long as the documents are normally subject to public review. However, if those completing reports are required to provide social security numbers, they may not be disclosed unless the state has complied with the requirements of 5 U.S.C. § 552a. March 4, 1996 Op. Att’y Gen.